Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2218.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Election worker communications platform; pilot program; appropriation; delayed repeal A. The secretary of state in cooperation and consultation with county recorders and election officers shall establish an election worker communications platform that is suitable for mobile application and use by election administrators and election workers, including poll workers, drivers, warehouse and supply workers, voter registration workers and central count center workers. B. The election worker communications platform shall be deployed in a pilot program in one or more counties or other jurisdictions or portions of counties or jurisdictions.  The secretary of state may offer use of the platform to counties at reduced or no cost. C. The sum of $200,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the secretary of state for the purposes of this act. D. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027.